Wisconsin, session 2025, SB855.
do enact as follows:SB855,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB855,1,44(1) Climate science research positions.SB855,1,55(a) In this subsection:SB855,1,661. “Board” means the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System.SB855,2,112. “Chancellor” means the chancellor of the University of Wisconsin-Madison.SB855,2,42(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.285 (1) (a), the board shall provide 3funding for 2.0 full-time equivalent research positions at the University of 4Wisconsin-Madison focusing on agriculture and climate change.SB855,2,55(c) The positions specified in par. (b) are subject to all of the following:SB855,2,761. The positions shall be filled using existing authorized full-time equivalent 7positions, funded from s. 20.285 (1) (a), that are currently vacant.SB855,2,982. The positions shall be filled in a manner that reflects an increase in the 9total number of research positions at the University of Wisconsin-Madison.SB855,2,11103. The positions shall be assigned to the division of extension at the 11University of Wisconsin-Madison.SB855,2,1312(d) The chancellor may not abolish under s. 16.505 (2p) the positions specified 13in par. (b).SB855,214Section 2. Fiscal changes.SB855,2,2215(1) UW climate science research positions. In the schedule under s. 1620.005 (3) for the appropriation to the Board of Regents of the University of 17Wisconsin System under s. 20.285 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 18is increased by $200,000 to provide funding for the positions specified in Section 1 19(1) of this act. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the Board 20of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System under s. 20.285 (1) (a), the dollar 21amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $200,000 to provide funding for the 22positions specified in Section 1 (1) of this act.SB855,2,2323